Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 889	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 889	dir	t/453	.		#present
SFX 889	dir	ts/453	.		#present
SFX 889	dir	dim/453	.		#present
SFX 889	dir	diu/453	.		#present
SFX 889	dir	den/453	.		#present

SFX 890	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 890	dre	rc/453	.		#present
SFX 890	dre	rts/453	.		#present
SFX 890	dre	rt/453	.		#present
SFX 890	dre	rdem/453	.		#present
SFX 890	dre	rdeu/453	.		#present
SFX 890	dre	rden/453	.		#present

SFX 891	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 891	dre	rga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 891	dre	rgues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 891	dre	rgam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 891	dre	rgau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 891	dre	rguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 892	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 892	dre	rguera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 892	dre	rgueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 892	dre	rguérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 892	dre	rguéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 892	dre	rgueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 893	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 893	dre	dre/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 893	dre	rt/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 893	dre	rga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 893	dre	rgam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 893	dre	rgau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 893	dre	rguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 894	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 894	dre	c/453	.		#present
SFX 894	dre	ts/453	.		#present
SFX 894	dre	t/453	.		#present
SFX 894	dre	dem/453	.		#present
SFX 894	dre	deu/453	.		#present
SFX 894	dre	den/453	.		#present

SFX 895	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 895	dre	rdré	.		#futur
SFX 895	dre	rdràs	.		#futur
SFX 895	dre	rdrà	.		#futur
SFX 895	dre	rdrem	.		#futur
SFX 895	dre	rdreu	.		#futur
SFX 895	dre	rdran	.		#futur

SFX 896	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 896	dre	dre/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 896	dre	ga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 896	dre	guen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 897	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 897	dre	dre/453	.		#present
SFX 897	dre	0/453	.		#present
SFX 897	dre	en/453	.		#present

SFX 898	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 898	dre	c/453	.		#present
SFX 898	dre	cs/453	.		#present
SFX 898	dre	0/453	.		#present
SFX 898	dre	em/453	.		#present
SFX 898	dre	eu/453	.		#present
SFX 898	dre	en/453	.		#present

SFX 899	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 899	dre	dre	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 899	dre	guera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 899	dre	gueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 900	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 900	dre	dre/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 900	dre	t/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 900	dre	ga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 900	dre	gam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 900	dre	gau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 900	dre	guen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 901	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 901	dre	rdria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 901	dre	rdries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 901	dre	rdríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 901	dre	rdríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 901	dre	rdrien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 902	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 902	dre	dre	.		#perfecte
SFX 902	dre	gué	.		#perfecte
SFX 902	dre	gueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 903	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 903	dre	rguí	.		#perfecte
SFX 903	dre	rgueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 903	dre	rgué	.		#perfecte
SFX 903	dre	rguérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 903	dre	rguéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 903	dre	rgueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 904	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 904	dre	rdia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 904	dre	rdies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 904	dre	rdíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 904	dre	rdíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 904	dre	rdien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 905	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 905	dre	dre	.		#imperfecte
SFX 905	dre	ia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 905	dre	ien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 906	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 906	e	ia	.		#hipotetic
SFX 906	e	ies	.		#hipotetic
SFX 906	e	íem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 906	e	ieu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 906	e	ien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 907	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 907	e	e	.		#hipotetic
SFX 907	e	ia	.		#hipotetic
SFX 907	e	ien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 908	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 908	e	e	.		#futur
SFX 908	e	à	.		#futur
SFX 908	e	an	.		#futur

SFX 909	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 909	eixir	eixir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 909	eixir	ïx/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 909	eixir	ïxca/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 909	eixir	ïxcam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 909	eixir	ïxcau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 909	eixir	ïxquen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 910	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 910	eixir	ïxc/453	.		#present
SFX 910	eixir	ïxes/453	.		#present
SFX 910	eixir	ïx/453	.		#present
SFX 910	eixir	eixim/453	.		#present
SFX 910	eixir	eixiu/453	.		#present
SFX 910	eixir	ïxen/453	.		#present

SFX 911	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 911	eixir	ïxca/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 911	eixir	ïxques/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 911	eixir	ïxcam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 911	eixir	ïxcau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 911	eixir	ïxquen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 912	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 912	eixir	ïxquí	.		#perfecte
SFX 912	eixir	ïxqueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 912	eixir	ïxqué	.		#perfecte
SFX 912	eixir	ïxquérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 912	eixir	ïxquéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 912	eixir	ïxqueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 913	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 913	eixir	ïxquera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 913	eixir	ïxqueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 913	eixir	ïxquérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 913	eixir	ïxquéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 913	eixir	ïxqueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 914	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 914	enir	inc/453	.		#present
SFX 914	enir	ens/453	.		#present
SFX 914	enir	é/453	.		#present
SFX 914	enir	enim/453	.		#present
SFX 914	enir	eniu/453	.		#present
SFX 914	enir	enen/453	.		#present

SFX 915	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 915	enir	inc/453	.		#present
SFX 915	enir	ens/453	.		#present
SFX 915	enir	e/453	.		#present
SFX 915	enir	enim/453	.		#present
SFX 915	enir	eniu/453	.		#present
SFX 915	enir	enen/453	.		#present

SFX 916	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 916	enir	enir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 916	enir	in/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 916	enir	inga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 916	enir	ingam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 916	enir	ingau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 916	enir	inguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 917	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 917	enir	enir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 917	enir	ine/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 917	enir	inga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 917	enir	ingam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 917	enir	ingau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 917	enir	inguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 918	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 918	entir	entir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 918	entir	intam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 918	entir	intau/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 919	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 919	enyir	inya/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 919	enyir	inyes/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 919	enyir	inyam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 919	enyir	inyau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 919	enyir	inyen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 920	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 920	enyir	enyir/453	.		#present
SFX 920	enyir	inyes/453	.		#present

SFX 921	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 921	enyir	inya/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 921	enyir	inyes/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 921	enyir	yinc/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 921	enyir	inyam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 921	enyir	inyau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 921	enyir	inyen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
