Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
caldre/896,897,899,902,905,907,908,1056
coestendre/482,483,484,485,490,507,508,906,1089
desimboldre/481,482,483,484,485,490,492,898,1109
pedre/451,481,482,890,891,892,893,895,901,903,904,1110
perdre/451,481,482,483,484,485,503,504,505,506,894,900,1057,1120
